Utah statutes.
70A-4a-103.   Payment order -- Definitions.
(1)  "Beneficiary" means the person to be paid by the beneficiary's bank.
(2)  "Beneficiary's bank" means the bank identified in a payment order in
which an account of the beneficiary is to be credited pursuant to the order or
which otherwise is to make payment to the beneficiary if the order does not
provide for payment to an account.
(3)  "Payment order" means an instruction of a sender to a receiving bank,
transmitted orally, electronically, or in writing, to pay, or to cause another
bank to pay, a fixed or determinable amount of money to a beneficiary if:
(a)  the instruction does not state a condition to payment to the beneficiary
other than time of payment;
(b)  the receiving bank is to be reimbursed by debiting an account of, or
otherwise receiving payment from, the sender; and
(c)  the instruction is transmitted by the sender directly to the receiving
bank or to an agent, funds transfer system, or communication system for
transmittal to the receiving bank.
(4)  "Receiving bank" means the bank to which the sender's instruction is
addressed.
(5)  "Sender" means the person giving the instruction to the receiving bank.
(6)  If an instruction complying with Subsection (3) is to make more than one
payment to a beneficiary, the instruction is a separate payment order with
respect to each of the payments.
(7)  A payment order is issued when it is sent to the receiving bank.
